North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-06 Care and Custody of Dead
23-06-19.
Interference with burial of dead limb or member of body — Penalty.

All provisions of this chapter requiring the burial of a dead body or punishing interference with or injuries to a dead body apply equally to any dead limb or member of a human body, separated therefrom during lifetime.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 354; R.C. 1895, § 7194; R.C. 1899, § 7194; R.C. 1905, § 8929; C.L. 1913, § 9623; R.C. 1943, § 23-0619.

23-06-20.
Where body may be buried.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

No dead human body may be buried in this state except in a properly registered cemetery or in some other place requested by the relatives and friends of the deceased if the same is authorized by the state department of health and all rules and regulations promulgated by the department in that connection have been complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0620; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Cemetery organizations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-21.1.

23-06-20.
Where body may be buried.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

No dead human body may be buried in this state except in a properly registered cemetery or in some other place requested by the relatives and friends of the deceased if the same is authorized by the department of health and human services and all rules and regulations promulgated by the department in that connection have been complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0620; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 165, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-21.
Regulation of cemeteries.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

All persons, corporations, municipalities, associations, and organizations owning, conducting, or maintaining a cemetery or plot for the burial of dead human bodies shall:

Provide for a sexton or secretary.

Cause the lot or parcel of ground used and designated as a cemetery to be platted into orderly blocks and lots, alleys and streets or driveways, giving to each a distinctive name or number that must be a permanent designation of its location.

File the original plat with the recorder of the county in which the cemetery or place of burial is located and the copy or blueprint thereof with the sexton or secretary.

Register with the state department of health the name and location of the cemetery or place of burial, the name and address of the sexton, and the name and address of other officers of the cemetery association, corporation, or organization.

Furnish such information and reports as the state department of health may require including the submission of plans and specifications for review and approval before constructing, erecting, or placing on the burial site for the burial or disposition of any human remains any interment structure or device constructed or placed wholly or partially above the natural surface of the ground.

Keep a local register of all burials showing as to each burial the name of the deceased, the date and location of burial, the date of death, and the name and address of the undertaker.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-0621; S.L. 1961, ch. 198, § 1; 1973, ch. 217, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2001, ch. 233, § 1.

Cross-References.

Power of municipalities to regulate cemetery, see N.D.C.C. § 40-05-01.

Collateral References.

Validity of public prohibition or regulation of location of cemetery, 50 A.L.R.2d 905.

Liability of cemetery in connection with conducting or supervising burial services, 42 A.L.R.4th 1059.

23-06-21.
Regulation of cemeteries.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

All persons, corporations, municipalities, associations, and organizations owning, conducting, or maintaining a cemetery or plot for the burial of dead human bodies shall:

Provide for a sexton or secretary.

Cause the lot or parcel of ground used and designated as a cemetery to be platted into orderly blocks and lots, alleys and streets or driveways, giving to each a distinctive name or number that must be a permanent designation of its location.

File the original plat with the recorder of the county in which the cemetery or place of burial is located and the copy or blueprint thereof with the sexton or secretary.

Register with the department of health and human services the name and location of the cemetery or place of burial, the name and address of the sexton, and the name and address of other officers of the cemetery association, corporation, or organization.

Furnish such information and reports as the department of health and human services may require including the submission of plans and specifications for review and approval before constructing, erecting, or placing on the burial site for the burial or disposition of any human remains any interment structure or device constructed or placed wholly or partially above the natural surface of the ground.

Keep a local register of all burials showing as to each burial the name of the deceased, the date and location of burial, the date of death, and the name and address of the undertaker.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-0621; S.L. 1961, ch. 198, § 1; 1973, ch. 217, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2001, ch. 233, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 166, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-21.1.
Title to burial plots reverts after sixty years — Procedure — Abandonment.

Any entity owning, conducting, or maintaining a cemetery or plot for the burial of dead human bodies may use the procedures in this section to reinvest itself with the title to a portion of a cemetery which was conveyed by deed to a person but which has not been used for purposes of burial for more than sixty years.

The entity owning, conducting, or maintaining a cemetery may pass a resolution demanding that the owner of a portion of a cemetery which has been unused for more than sixty years express an interest in the cemetery plot. The entity shall personally serve a copy of its resolution on the owner in the same manner as personal service of process in a civil action. The resolution must notify the owner that the owner must, within sixty days after service of the resolution on the owner, express an interest in retaining the unused cemetery plot.

If the owner of the unused plot cannot personally be served with a copy of the resolution of the entity because the owner cannot be found in this state or for any other valid reason, the entity shall publish its resolution for three consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the county where the cemetery is located and shall mail a copy of the resolution within fourteen days after the third publication to the owner’s last-known address.

If within sixty days after personal service or after publication of the board’s resolution is completed, the owner or person with a legal interest in the cemetery plot fails to express an interest in retaining the unused cemetery plot, the owner’s rights are terminated and title to that person’s plot reverts to the entity owning, conducting, or maintaining the cemetery.

It is a conclusive presumption that an owner has abandoned a cemetery plot if for a period of more than sixty years the owner has not used any portion of the lot for purposes of burial and has not made provision for care of the lot beyond that provided uniformly to all lots within the cemetery and if the owner has failed to express an interest in retaining the cemetery plot after notice provided in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 294, § 1.

23-06-22.
Sexton — Term of office, records, duties.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The sexton or secretary appointed by the person, corporation, municipality, association, or organization conducting a cemetery for the burial of dead human bodies shall hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified. The sexton or secretary shall transfer all records to the successor. The sexton or secretary shall enforce the laws of the state and the rules and regulations of the state department of health with respect to the burial of dead human bodies within the cemetery under the sexton’s or secretary’s charge.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0622; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Requirements as to burial permit, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-02.1-21, 23-06-07 to 23-06-12.

23-06-22.
Sexton — Term of office, records, duties.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The sexton or secretary appointed by the person, corporation, municipality, association, or organization conducting a cemetery for the burial of dead human bodies shall hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified. The sexton or secretary shall transfer all records to the successor. The sexton or secretary shall enforce the laws of the state and the rules and regulations of the department of health and human services with respect to the burial of dead human bodies within the cemetery under the sexton’s or secretary’s charge.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 2, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0622; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 167, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-23.
State department of health to enforce regulation of cemeteries — Injunction.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall make and enforce such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the laws relating to the regulation of cemeteries and may, through injunction or other legal process, enforce compliance.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 23-0623; S.L. 1961, ch. 198, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-06-23.
Department to enforce regulation of cemeteries — Injunction.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall make and enforce such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the laws relating to the regulation of cemeteries and may, through injunction or other legal process, enforce compliance.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 104, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 23-0623; S.L. 1961, ch. 198, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 168, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-24.
Unlawful removal of dead body — Penalty.

Every person who removes any part of the dead body of a human being from any grave or other place where the same has been buried, or from any place where the same is deposited while awaiting burial, except as provided by law, is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 358; R.C. 1895, § 7198; R.C. 1899, § 7198; R.C. 1905, § 8933; C.L. 1913, § 9627; R.C. 1943, § 23-0624; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 233.

Cross-References.

Disturbance of dead body an offense, see N.D.C.C. § 11-19.1-07.1.

Penalty for class C felony, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Dead bodies: liability for improper manner of reinterment, 53 A.L.R.4th 394.

Liability for desecration of graves and tombstones, 77 A.L.R.4th 108.

23-06-24.1.
Endangered gravesites — County action authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the county commissioners of each county may move graves or cremate the bodies in any graves which are located in the county and maintained by the county when the gravesites are in imminent danger of destruction by natural elements. The county commissioners shall, to the extent possible, give personal notice to a relative of a deceased person whose grave is to be moved or whose body is to be cremated if the identity of that person and the identity of the relative are known. The county commissioners shall provide at least thirty days’ prior notice in a legal newspaper of the county of the commissioners’ intended action to be taken pursuant to this section.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 291, § 1.

23-06-25.
When body may be removed from cemetery — Penalty for failure to remove.

Whenever a cemetery or other place of burial is lawfully authorized to be removed from one place to another, the right and duty to disinter, remove, and rebury the remains of bodies there lying buried devolves upon the persons whose duty it is to bury the bodies, in the order in which they are named in section 23-06-03. If all such persons fail to act, the duty devolves upon the lawful custodians of the place of burial so removed. Every omission of such duty is punishable in the same manner as other omissions to perform the duty of making burial are punishable.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 361; R.C. 1895, § 7201; R.C. 1899, § 7201; R.C. 1905, § 8936; C.L. 1913, § 9630; R.C. 1943, § 23-0625.

Cross-References.

Disinterment and removal of bodies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-21.

Collateral References.

Removal and reinterment of remains, 21 A.L.R.2d 472.

Court’s power to order disinterment and autopsy or examination for evidential purposes in civil case, 21 A.L.R.2d 538.

Private or family cemetery, right to disinter and remove body from, 75 A.L.R.2d 591.

23-06-26.
Purchasing body forbidden — Penalty.

Every person who purchases or who receives, except for the purpose of final disposition, any dead body of a human being, knowing that the same has been removed contrary to the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 359; R.C. 1895, § 7199; R.C. 1899, § 7199; R.C. 1905, § 8934; C.L. 1913, § 9628; R.C. 1943, § 23-0626; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 234; 2017, ch. 92, § 19, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class C felony, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

23-06-27.
Protection of human burial sites, human remains, and burial goods — Unlawful acts — Penalties — Exceptions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Burial goods” means any objects or items interred with human remains at the time of burial.

“Disturb” means move, open, expose, dig up, disinter, excavate, remove, carry away, damage, injure, deface, desecrate, loot, vandalize, mutilate, or destroy.

“Human burial site” means any place of interment, by any means, of human remains or burial goods, which is designated by a grave marker or other burial structure or which is not so designated, but is, in fact, discovered or believed to exist on the basis of archaeological or historical evidence.

“Human remains” means any part of the body of a deceased human being in any stage of decomposition.

“Land” means all lands, including submerged lands, located within the state of North Dakota which are owned by the state or its political subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities, or by any private person.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, proprietorship, or governmental entity.

A person is guilty of a class C felony who, without authority of law, breaks open any building wherein any body of a deceased human being is deposited while awaiting burial, with the intent of either removing such human body, or any part thereof, or stealing the coffin, or any part thereof, or anything attached thereto or connected therewith, or the vestments or other articles intended to be buried with the human body.

A person is guilty of a felony who, without authority of law, willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, disturbs a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods found in or on any land, or attempts to do the same, or incites or procures the same to be done.

A person is guilty of a class B felony if the offense in this subsection was committed for monetary gain, whether or not such monetary gain was related to the use of the land in or on which the burial, remains, or goods were disturbed.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if the offense in this subsection was not committed for monetary gain.

Any person who knows or has reasonable grounds to believe that a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods, found in or on any land, are being disturbed or may be disturbed, by human activity without authority of law or by natural forces, shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the area in which the burial, remains, or goods are located. A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who is required to provide such notification and willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, fails to provide the same.

Any person who knows or has reasonable grounds to believe that that person has encountered or discovered a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods associated with a human burial, in or on any land, shall refrain from any activity which might disturb or immediately cease any continued activity which might cause further disturbance of such burial, remains, or goods and shall, as soon as practicable, report the presence or discovery of the burial, remains, or goods to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the area in which the burial, remains, or goods are located. A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who is required to make such report and willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, fails to make the same. The requirements imposed in this subsection do not apply to any person engaged in the salvaging excavation or other disinterment of a human burial under authority of law.

Any person having been found guilty or having pleaded guilty, as a result of having been charged with an offense under subsection 2 or 3, must be ordered to forfeit to the state any and all human remains and burial goods acquired in connection with the commission of the offense and may be ordered to forfeit to the state any and all equipment used in connection with the commission of the offense. In addition, any such person having been charged with an offense under subsection 3 must be ordered to pay all reasonable costs actually incurred in the reinterment of the human remains and burial goods so forfeited. In conjunction with the prosecution of any offense under this subsection, the remains in question in the prosecution may, as deemed necessary, be subjected to nonintrusive, nondestructive professional study for the exclusive purpose of determining whether the remains are human.

Subsection 3 does not apply to the inadvertent disturbance of a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods when the state department of health and the state historical society have been notified of the disturbance and the human remains and burial goods must be studied and reinterred pursuant to rules adopted by the state department of health and the state historical society. Subsection 3 also does not apply to situations in which the state department of health and the state historical society are notified of the need to disinter and move the contents of human burial sites that are recorded with the state historical society to prevent the destruction of the human burial sites by actions including the construction of highways, dams, reservoirs, coal mines, power generation and transmission facilities, pipelines, farming practices, and other developments. Where feasible, the developments should avoid disturbance of the human burial sites. In these situations the disinterred human remains and burial goods must be studied and reinterred pursuant to rules adopted by the state department of health and the state historical society.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 360; R.C. 1895, § 7200; R.C. 1899, § 7200; R.C. 1905, § 8935; C.L. 1913, § 9629; R.C. 1943, § 23-0627; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 235; 1983, ch. 291, § 1; 1987, ch. 295, § 1; 1989, ch. 307, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 503, § 3.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Disturbance of dead body an offense, see N.D.C.C. § 11-19.1-07.1.

Permits to excavate cultural resources on private land, see N.D.C.C. § 55-03-02.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of grave-robbing statutes, 52 A.L.R.3d 701.

23-06-27.
Protection of human burial sites, human remains, and burial goods — Unlawful acts — Penalties — Exceptions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Burial goods” means any objects or items interred with human remains at the time of burial.

“Disturb” means move, open, expose, dig up, disinter, excavate, remove, carry away, damage, injure, deface, desecrate, loot, vandalize, mutilate, or destroy.

“Human burial site” means any place of interment, by any means, of human remains or burial goods, which is designated by a grave marker or other burial structure or which is not so designated, but is, in fact, discovered or believed to exist on the basis of archaeological or historical evidence.

“Human remains” means any part of the body of a deceased human being in any stage of decomposition.

“Land” means all lands, including submerged lands, located within the state of North Dakota which are owned by the state or its political subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities, or by any private person.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, proprietorship, or governmental entity.

A person is guilty of a class C felony who, without authority of law, breaks open any building wherein any body of a deceased human being is deposited while awaiting burial, with the intent of either removing such human body, or any part thereof, or stealing the coffin, or any part thereof, or anything attached thereto or connected therewith, or the vestments or other articles intended to be buried with the human body.

A person is guilty of a felony who, without authority of law, willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, disturbs a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods found in or on any land, or attempts to do the same, or incites or procures the same to be done.

A person is guilty of a class B felony if the offense in this subsection was committed for monetary gain, whether or not such monetary gain was related to the use of the land in or on which the burial, remains, or goods were disturbed.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if the offense in this subsection was not committed for monetary gain.

Any person who knows or has reasonable grounds to believe that a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods, found in or on any land, are being disturbed or may be disturbed, by human activity without authority of law or by natural forces, shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the area in which the burial, remains, or goods are located. A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who is required to provide such notification and willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, fails to provide the same.

Any person who knows or has reasonable grounds to believe that that person has encountered or discovered a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods associated with a human burial, in or on any land, shall refrain from any activity which might disturb or immediately cease any continued activity which might cause further disturbance of such burial, remains, or goods and shall, as soon as practicable, report the presence or discovery of the burial, remains, or goods to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the area in which the burial, remains, or goods are located. A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who is required to make such report and willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, fails to make the same. The requirements imposed in this subsection do not apply to any person engaged in the salvaging excavation or other disinterment of a human burial under authority of law.

Any person having been found guilty or having pleaded guilty, as a result of having been charged with an offense under subsection 2 or 3, must be ordered to forfeit to the state any and all human remains and burial goods acquired in connection with the commission of the offense and may be ordered to forfeit to the state any and all equipment used in connection with the commission of the offense. In addition, any such person having been charged with an offense under subsection 3 must be ordered to pay all reasonable costs actually incurred in the reinterment of the human remains and burial goods so forfeited. In conjunction with the prosecution of any offense under this subsection, the remains in question in the prosecution may, as deemed necessary, be subjected to nonintrusive, nondestructive professional study for the exclusive purpose of determining whether the remains are human.

Subsection 3 does not apply to the inadvertent disturbance of a human burial site, human remains, or burial goods when the department of health and human services and the state historical society have been notified of the disturbance and the human remains and burial goods must be studied and reinterred pursuant to rules adopted by the department of health and human services and the state historical society. Subsection 3 also does not apply to situations in which the department of health and human services and the state historical society are notified of the need to disinter and move the contents of human burial sites that are recorded with the state historical society to prevent the destruction of the human burial sites by actions including the construction of highways, dams, reservoirs, coal mines, power generation and transmission facilities, pipelines, farming practices, and other developments. Where feasible, the developments should avoid disturbance of the human burial sites. In these situations the disinterred human remains and burial goods must be studied and reinterred pursuant to rules adopted by the department of health and human services and the state historical society.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 360; R.C. 1895, § 7200; R.C. 1899, § 7200; R.C. 1905, § 8935; C.L. 1913, § 9629; R.C. 1943, § 23-0627; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 235; 1983, ch. 291, § 1; 1987, ch. 295, § 1; 1989, ch. 307, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 503, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 169, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-28.
Arresting or attaching dead body — Penalty.

Every person who arrests or attaches any dead body of a human being upon any debt or demand whatever, or who detains or claims to detain it for any debt or demand or upon any pretended lien or charge, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 362; R.C. 1895, § 7202; R.C. 1899, § 7202; R.C. 1905, § 8937; C.L. 1913, § 9631; R.C. 1943, § 23-0628; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 236.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class B misdemeansor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

23-06-29.
Penalty for violating provisions relating to dissections and general penalty.

Every person who violates any provision of this chapter relative to the dissection of dead bodies of human beings, or who makes or procures to be made any dissection of the body of a human being except by authority of law or in pursuance of permission given in accordance with the provision of this chapter, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. Every person who violates any provision of this chapter for the violation of which another penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, §§ 352, 365; R.C. 1895, §§ 7192, 7205; R.C. 1899, §§ 7192, 7205; R.C. 1905, §§ 8927, 8940; S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 22; C.L. 1913, §§ 455, 9621, 9634; R.C. 1943, § 23-0629; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 237.

23-06-30.
Abandoned cemeteries to be maintained by counties.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The board of county commissioners of each county may provide for the identification, cataloging, recording, and shall provide for the general maintenance and upkeep of each abandoned cemetery located within such county using revenues derived from its general fund levy authority. The board shall, at least once each year, proceed to have the weeds and grass cut, restore gravestones to their original placement, and perform any other general maintenance necessary to maintain the dignity and appearance of the grounds. For the purposes of this section, a cemetery means any tract of land used as a burial plot and which is filed with the recorder of the county as a public burying place. The board of county commissioners of each county shall provide for the registration, with the state department of health, of each abandoned cemetery within such county unless such cemetery has been previously registered. Such registration must take place within one year of notification being made to the board, by any interested party of the existence of such abandoned cemetery.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 191, § 1; 1977, ch. 221, § 1; 1981, ch. 282, § 1; 1983, ch. 292, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 25, eff. for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Cross-References.

Tax levy for maintenance of abandoned cemeteries, see N.D.C.C. § 57-15-27.2.

23-06-30.
Abandoned cemeteries to be maintained by counties.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The board of county commissioners of each county may provide for the identification, cataloging, recording, and shall provide for the general maintenance and upkeep of each abandoned cemetery located within such county using revenues derived from its general fund levy authority. The board shall, at least once each year, proceed to have the weeds and grass cut, restore gravestones to their original placement, and perform any other general maintenance necessary to maintain the dignity and appearance of the grounds. For the purposes of this section, a cemetery means any tract of land used as a burial plot and which is filed with the recorder of the county as a public burying place. The board of county commissioners of each county shall provide for the registration, with the department of health and human services, of each abandoned cemetery within such county unless such cemetery has been previously registered. Such registration must take place within one year of notification being made to the board, by any interested party of the existence of such abandoned cemetery.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 191, § 1; 1977, ch. 221, § 1; 1981, ch. 282, § 1; 1983, ch. 292, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 25, eff. for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2021, ch. 352, § 170, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-31.
Cremation or other lawful disposition of a body — Authorization document — Immunity.

A legally competent adult may prepare a written statement directing the cremation or other lawful disposition of that adult’s own remains pursuant to section 23-06-03. The written statement must be signed and dated by the legally competent adult and may be part of the legally competent adult’s will.

A document that conforms to this section authorizes a crematorium or funeral establishment to carry out the instructions of the legally competent adult who is the subject of the document. It is not necessary for a crematorium or funeral establishment to obtain the consent or concurrence of any other person when the crematorium or funeral establishment cremates or otherwise provides for the lawful disposition of a body pursuant to instructions contained in a document that conforms to this section.

This section does not mandate that a crematorium or funeral establishment cremate or otherwise provide for the lawful disposition of a body pursuant to the document unless the legally competent adult who executed the document articulated and funded in a pre-need funeral service contract the legally competent adult’s instructions as expressed in the document.

A crematorium or funeral establishment that cremates or otherwise provides for the lawful disposition of a body in good-faith reliance upon instructions of a decedent or an individual to whom the crematorium or funeral establishment reasonably believes is entitled to control final disposition pursuant to section 23-06-03 or on an apparently genuine document executed pursuant to this section is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional discipline. The decision of a crematorium or funeral establishment to cremate or otherwise provide for the lawful disposition of a body in reliance on a document executed pursuant to this section is presumed to be made in good faith.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 215, § 2; 2019, ch. 207, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.